Utah statutes.
68-3-9.   Seal, how affixed.
When the seal of a court or public officer is required by law to be affixed to
any paper, the word "seal" includes an impression of such seal upon the  paper
alone, as well as upon wax or a wafer affixed thereto. In all other cases the
word "seal" may include a scroll printed or written.
